Wisconsin, session 2025, SB273.
do enact as follows:SB273,13Section 1. 347.40 (4) of the statutes is created to read:SB273,2,24347.40 (4) Notwithstanding sub. (1) and 49 CFR 393.80 (a), a commercial 1motor vehicle may be equipped with a camera monitor system approved by the 2federal motor carrier safety administration as an alternative to mirrors.SB273,2,33